Massachusetts, session 194th, S1806.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 96 of the acts of 2014, as amended by chapter 266 of
the acts of 2016, is hereby amended by striking out the figure “70” and inserting in place thereof
the following figure:- “75”.
SECTION 2. Said section 1 of said chapter 96 of the acts of 2014, as amended by said
chapter 266 of the acts of 2016, is hereby further amended by inserting after the words “Prior to
appointment under this act” the following:- “, and annually thereafter unless required more often
by the police chief”.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of said chapter 96 of the acts of 2014, as amended by said chapter
266 of the acts of 2016, is hereby amended by striking out the words “41, chapter 150E or
of 2

chapter 151A of the General Laws” and inserting in place thereof the following:- “41 or chapter
150E of the General Laws”.
SECTION 4. Section 8 of said chapter 96 of the acts of 2014, as amended by said chapter
266 of the acts of 2016, is hereby amended by striking out the figure “70” and inserting in place
thereof the following figure:- “75”.
of 2